Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-109
State projects; control and supervision by Governor; when authorized; delegation of powers.

Wherever statewide projects contributed to by any federal agency are initiated within the state, and there is no state agency which is authorized by law to sponsor the same, the same may be sponsored by the Governor under his general power to take care that the affairs of the state be efficiently and economically administered. This power granted to the Governor shall include the power to cooperate with, or to supervise or to act in an advisory capacity as to any and all projects contributed to by any federal agency, as to which statewide supervision, direction, or advisory control may be deemed expedient; Provided, that for the purpose of efficient execution of the powers hereby bestowed, the Governor may delegate actual performance of such duties as may be necessary to any department or agency of the state to which it may seem proper and expedient to him to make such delegation.

Laws 1941, c. 175, § 1, p. 685;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 81-126;

R.S.1943, § 84-109;

Laws 1961, c. 450, § 1, p. 1375.